New York, session 2025-2026, S9384.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 5 of section 590 of the labor 2 law, as amended by section 3 of part KK of chapter 56 of the laws of 3 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4 (a) A claimant's average weekly [benefit amount] wage shall be one 5 [twenty-sixth] thirteenth of the remuneration paid during the highest 6 calendar quarter of the base period by employers, liable for contrib- 7 utions or payments in lieu of contributions under this article, provided 8 the claimant has remuneration paid in all four calendar quarters during 9 such claimant's base period or alternate base period. [However, for any 10 claimant who has remuneration paid in all four calendar quarters during 11 such claimant's base period or alternate base period and whose high 12 calendar quarter remuneration during the base period is three thousand 13 five hundred seventy-five dollars or less, the benefit amount shall be 14 one twenty-fifth of the remuneration paid during the highest calendar 15 quarter of the base period by employers liable for contributions or 16 payments in lieu of contributions under this article.] A claimant's 17 average weekly [benefit] wage shall be one [twenty-sixth] thirteenth of 18 the average remuneration paid in the two highest quarters paid during 19 the base period or alternate base period by employers liable for 20 contributions or payments in lieu of contributions under this article 21 when the claimant has remuneration paid in two or three calendar quar- 22 ters [provided however, that a claimant whose high calendar quarter is 23 four thousand dollars or less but greater than three thousand five 24 hundred seventy-five dollars shall have a weekly benefit amount of one 25 twenty-sixth of such high calendar quarter. However, for any claimant 26 who has remuneration paid in two or three calendar quarters during such 27 claimant's base period or alternate base period and whose high calendar 28 quarter remuneration during the base period is three thousand five EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14259-02-6 S. 9384 2 1 hundred seventy-five dollars or less, the benefit amount shall be one 2 twenty-fifth of the remuneration paid during the highest calendar quar- 3 ter of the base period by employers liable for contributions or payments 4 in lieu of contributions under this article. Any claimant whose high 5 calendar quarter remuneration during the base period is more than three 6 thousand five hundred seventy-five dollars shall not have a weekly bene- 7 fit amount less than one hundred forty-three dollars. The weekly benefit 8 amount, so computed, that is not a multiple of one dollar shall be 9 lowered to the next multiple of one dollar]. If a claimant's average 10 weekly wage as calculated pursuant to this paragraph is between zero and 11 fifty percent of the state average weekly wage, such claimant's weekly 12 benefit shall be equal to eighty-five percent of such claimant's average 13 weekly wage. If a claimant's average weekly wage as calculated pursuant 14 to this paragraph is between fifty-one and one hundred percent of the 15 state average weekly wage, such claimant's weekly benefit shall be equal 16 to seventy percent of such claimant's average weekly wage. If a claim- 17 ant's average weekly wage as calculated pursuant to this paragraph is 18 greater than one hundred percent of the state average weekly wage, such 19 claimant's weekly benefit shall be equal to fifty percent of such claim- 20 ant's average weekly wage. On the first Monday of September, nineteen 21 hundred ninety-eight the weekly benefit amount shall not exceed three 22 hundred sixty-five dollars nor be less than forty dollars, until the 23 first Monday of September, two thousand, at which time the maximum bene- 24 fit payable pursuant to this subdivision shall equal one-half of the 25 state average weekly wage for covered employment as calculated by the 26 department no sooner than July first, two thousand and no later than 27 August first, two thousand, rounded down to the lowest dollar. On and 28 after the first Monday of October, two thousand fourteen, the weekly 29 benefit shall not be less than one hundred dollars, nor shall it exceed 30 four hundred twenty dollars until the first Monday of October, two thou- 31 sand fifteen when the maximum benefit amount shall be four hundred twen- 32 ty-five dollars, until the first Monday of October, two thousand sixteen 33 when the maximum benefit amount shall be four hundred thirty dollars, 34 until the first Monday of October, two thousand seventeen when the maxi- 35 mum benefit amount shall be four hundred thirty-five dollars, until the 36 first Monday of October, two thousand eighteen when the maximum benefit 37 amount shall be four hundred fifty dollars, until the first Monday of 38 October, two thousand nineteen when the maximum benefit amount shall be 39 thirty-six percent of the average weekly wage until the first Monday of 40 October, two thousand twenty-five when the maximum benefit amount shall 41 be eight hundred sixty-nine dollars, until the first Monday of October, 42 two thousand twenty-six and each year thereafter on the first Monday of 43 October when the maximum benefit amount shall be fifty percent of the 44 average weekly wage provided, however, that in no event shall the maxi- 45 mum benefit amount be reduced from the previous year. 46 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.